Massachusetts, session 194th, H2096.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4 the following section:-
Section 4A. (a) For procurement contracts for supplies and services, including
construction, that are estimated to cost more than $50,000, each awarding authority shall ensure
that solicitations or invitations for bids require that the offeror represent, to the best of the
offeror's knowledge and belief, whether there has been any Occupational Safety and Health
Administration citation, notice, decision, or civil judgment rendered against the company, as a
sole proprietorship, limited partnership, and/or limited liability partnership/corporation and/or
any affiliated business or subsidiary of which the applicant is owner, manager, officer, and/or
director within the preceding 4-year period for a violation of the federal Occupational Safety and
of 4

Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678, including any settlement agreement and
documentation verifying if hazards identified have been corrected.
(b) An awarding authority, prior to making an award, shall, as part of responsibility
determination, provide an offeror with an opportunity to disclose any steps taken to correct any
violations of or improve compliance with said federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of
1970, including any settlement agreement and documentation verifying if hazards identified have
been corrected.
(c) An awarding authority shall consider the information provided pursuant to
subsections (a) and (b) in determining whether an offeror is a responsible source.
(d) For any subcontract where the estimated value of the supplies and services required
exceeds $50,000, an awarding authority shall require that, at the time of execution of the
contract, a contractor represents to the contracting agency that the contractor will require each
subcontractor to disclose to the awarding authority a citation, notice, decision or civil judgment,
rendered against the subcontractor within the preceding 4-year period for a violation of said
federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, said 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678,
including any settlement agreement and documentation verifying if hazards identified, have been
corrected, and to provide to the awarding authority updated information every 6 months.
(e) As appropriate, an awarding authority shall refer matters related to information
provided pursuant to subsections (a), (b), and (d) of this section to the appropriate agency.
(f) During the performance of the contract, each awarding authority shall require that
every 6 months contractors subject to this section update the information provided pursuant to
subsection (a).
of 4

(g) If information regarding a citation, notice, decision, or civil judgment, rendered
against the offeror within the preceding 4-year period for any violations of said federal
Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, said 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678, including any
settlement agreements and documentation verifying if hazards identified have corrected, or
similar information is obtained through other sources, an awarding authority may request a copy
of a citation and evidence of abatement of a hazard, and refer the offeror to appropriate agencies
if a hazard has not been abated.
(h) An awarding authority shall require that if information regarding a citation, notice,
decision or civil judgment, rendered against a contractor’s subcontractor within the preceding 4-
year period for any violations of said federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, said
29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678 is brought to the attention of the contractor or similar information
is obtained through other sources, then the contractor shall inform the awarding authority and the
awarding authority may request a copy of a citation and evidence of abatement of a hazard, and
refer the subcontractor to appropriate agencies if a hazard has not been abated.
(i) As appropriate, awarding authorities shall send information provided pursuant to
subsection (a) and subsection (d) of this section to the appropriate agency.
(j) Nothing in this section shall preclude the exercise or enforcement of any lawful rights
or remedies.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 82A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth sentence on line 13 the
following sentence:- A person making application for a trench excavation permit shall disclose in
writing: (a) Any citation, notice, decision or civil judgment rendered against the company, as a
of 4

sole proprietorship, limited partnership, and/or limited liability partnership/corporation and/or
any affiliated business or subsidiary of which the applicant is owner, manager, officer, and/or
director within the preceding 4-year period for a violation of the federal Occupational Safety and
Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678, including any settlement agreement and
documentation verifying if hazards identified have been corrected; and
(b) (i) any prior suspension or revocation of a trench excavation permit held by the
applicant; (ii) any assessment of fines in relation to a trench excavation permit held by applicant;
(iii) any prior immediate shutdown of a trench site by state or local authorities in relation to a
trench excavation permit held by applicant; and (iv) the date of each incident.
of 4